Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.220

Compliance with chapter a defense in any action.

In any civil or criminal action or proceeding for violation of any rule of [or] statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade, proof that the act complained of was done in compliance with the provisions of this chapter or a marketing order issued under this chapter, and in furtherance of the purposes and provisions of this chapter, shall be a complete defense to such action or proceeding.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.66.220. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 22.]